tests/cv-runouns.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../chv.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../chv.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Russian nouns that behave normally":
    стена<n><nom> : стена
    стена<n><gen> : стенан
    стена<n><dat> : стенана
    стена<n><loc> : стенара
    стена<n><abl> : стенаран
    стена<n><ins> : стенапа
    стена<n>+сӑр<post> : стенасӑр
    стена<n><ter> : стенашӑн

  "Russian nouns that have reduced back vowels":
    сцена<n><nom> : сцена
    сцена<n><gen> : сценӑн
    сцена<n><dat> : сценӑна
    сцена<n><loc> : сценӑра
    сцена<n><abl> : сценӑран
    сцена<n><ins> : сценӑпа
    сцена<n>+сӑр<post> : сценӑсӑр
    сцена<n><ter> : сценӑшӑн

  "Russian nouns with blocked vowel harmony":
    музей<n><nom> : музей
    музей<n><gen> : музейӑн
    музей<n><dat> : музея
    музей<n><loc> : музейра
    музей<n><abl> : музейран
    музей<n><ins> : музейпа
    музей<n>+сӑр<post> : музейсӑр
    музей<n><ter> : музейшӑн

  "Russian nouns that have reduced front vowels":
    училище<n><nom> : училище
    училище<n><gen> : училищӗн
    училище<n><dat> : училищӗне
    училище<n><loc> : училищӗре
    училище<n><abl> : училищӗрен
    училище<n><ins> : училищӗпе
    училище<n>+сӑр<post> : училищӗсӗр
    училище<n><ter> : училищӗшӗн

  "Russian nouns with reduced back vowels and ь":
    Петя<np><ant><m><nom> : Петя
    Петя<np><ant><m><gen> : Петьӑн
    Петя<np><ant><m><dat> : Петьӑна
    Петя<np><ant><m><loc> : Петьӑра
    Петя<np><ant><m><abl> : Петьӑран
    Петя<np><ant><m><ins> : Петьӑпа
    Петя<np><ant><m>+сӑр<post> : Петьӑсӑр
    Петя<np><ant><m><ter> : Петьӑшӑн

  "Russian nouns with reduced front vowels and ь":
    платье<n><nom> : платье
    платье<n><gen> : платйӗн
    платье<n><dat> : платйӗне
    платье<n><loc> : платйӗре
    платье<n><abl> : платйӗрен
    платье<n><ins> : платйӗпе
    платье<n>+сӑр<post> : платйӗсӗр
    платье<n><ter> : платйӗшӗн
